California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
(i) Prior to making any expenditure from the Advance Mitigation Account, the Director of Transportation shall make a determination and justification that the
 proposed expenditure is likely to accelerate project delivery of specific projects.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 463, Sec. 10.   (AB 2805)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

800.7.

The Advance Mitigation Account is hereby created in the State Transportation Fund as a revolving fund. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the account shall be continuously appropriated without regard to fiscal years for purposes of the Advance Mitigation Program. The activity of the account shall be reported to the commission. The program is intended to become self-sustaining. Expenditures from the account shall later be reimbursed from project funding available at the time a planned transportation project is constructed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 95, Sec. 13.   (SB 103)   Effective July 21, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

800.8.

The program is intended to improve the efficiency and efficacy of mitigation only and is not intended to supplant the requirements of the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resource Code) or any other environmental law. The identification of planned transportation projects and of mitigation projects or measures for planned transportation projects under this article does not imply or require approval of those projects for purposes of the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resource Code) or any other environmental law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 95, Sec. 14.   (SB 103)   Effective July 21, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

800.9.

The department, pursuant to this article and for the purpose of implementing the Advance Mitigation Program, may develop a programmatic mitigation plan pursuant to Section 169 of Title 23 of the United States Code to address the potential environmental impacts of future transportation projects for the purpose of required mitigation approved by federal, state, and local agencies. The programmatic mitigation plans shall include, to the maximum extent practicable, the information required for regional conservation investment strategies.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 95, Sec. 15.   (SB 103)   Effective July 21, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Miscellaneous Provisions [810. - 810.]

810.

Any county, city or permanent road division, within the limits of which there is a State highway, may do or order to be done on any such highway any paving, curbing, highway work or sewer work authorized by law. Such governmental unit shall first obtain from the department a permit to do any such work. All grades, elevations or curb lines sought to be established or pavement proposed to be constructed by any such governmental unit shall first be approved by the department. Such governmental unit shall restore, to the satisfaction of the department, any existing pavement which is damaged as a result of such work.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. State and Federal Highway Work [820. - 828.]

820.

The State of California assents to the provisions of Title 23 of the United States Code, as amended and supplemented, other acts of Congress relative to federal aid, or other cooperative highway work, or to emergency construction of public highways with funds apportioned by the government of the United States. All work done under the provisions of Title 23 or other acts of Congress relative to highways shall be performed as required under acts of Congress and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder. Laws, or rules and regulations, of this state inconsistent with the laws, or rules and regulations, of the United States, shall not apply to that work, to the extent of the inconsistency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 525, Sec. 36.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

820.1.

(a) The State of California consents to the jurisdiction of the federal courts with regard to the compliance, discharge, or enforcement of the responsibilities assumed by the department pursuant to Section 326 of, and subsection (a) of Section 327 of, Title 23 of the United States Code.

(b) In any action brought pursuant to the federal laws described in subdivision (a), no immunity from suit may be asserted by the department pursuant to the Eleventh Amendment to the United States Constitution, and any immunity is hereby waived.

(c) The department shall not delegate any of its responsibilities assumed pursuant to the federal laws described in subdivision (a) to any political subdivision of the state or
 its instrumentalities.

(d) This section does not affect the obligation of the department to comply with state and federal law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 160, Sec. 1.   (AB 252)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

820.5.

The department may enter into agreements with authorized officials of the United States for the performance of street or highway construction, improvement, or maintenance projects, including the acquisition of necessary rights-of-way therefor, for military, naval, access, and tactical highways, including highways providing access to timber or other natural resources, regardless of whether or not such highways are on the state highway system. As to any project not on the state highway system, such agreement shall provide for full reimbursement to the department, except for general administrative and administrative engineering expenses.

As to any such street or highway, the department and the commission are, and each of them is, authorized to do any and all things in connection therewith as may be done with reference to the state highways. The commission may adopt resolutions authorizing condemnation of property necessary for such highways with like effect as it may with reference to state highways. All provisions of this article shall apply to any work done by the department under any such agreement.

If desired by the United States, title to any real property, or interest therein, acquired by the department in connection with any such street or highway which is not a part of the state highway system may be transferred to the United States, or any agency thereof, by a conveyance executed on behalf of the State of California by the director. Such conveyance shall only be made in the event the state has been fully reimbursed for any expenditures made in connection with the acquisition of such property or interest therein. Upon completion of the construction of any such highway which is not a state highway, it shall forthwith be turned over to the United States for maintenance and control, if the United States will accept the highway. If the United States will not accept the maintenance and control thereof, such highway shall become a city street or county highway, as the case may be, upon the passage by the commission of a resolution to that effect.

The department may enter into like agreements with authorized officials of the United States to furnish other engineering services, such as laboratory services, upon the condition that the state shall be reimbursed in full therefor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

821.

The department, on behalf of the State, shall submit to the Secretary of Agriculture, or other properly authorized officer of the United States, such project statements as may be required and may agree with the proper officials of the United States as to the kind, quality, and extent of all such work. The department shall file in its office all approved plans, specifications, and estimates.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 76.)
-------------------------------------------

822.

The department is authorized to do any and all acts and things with reference to any military or public street or highway in, or to be constructed in, this State necessary to the performance of any such agreement, including but not limited to the construction or improvement of streets, highways or roads which are not a part of the State Highway System.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 76.)
-------------------------------------------

822.5.

Agreements are authorized between the department and any county, or counties, or city, or cities, providing for the acquisition of property for, the construction, improvement and maintenance of any highway, including those not in the State Highway System, and those lying partly within and partly without the boundaries of the State, to be constructed with federal aid. The department may, when authorized by any such written agreement, acquire for the county or city, as the case may be, any real property within the State required for any such highway which is not in the State Highway System.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 76.)
-------------------------------------------

823.

In addition to the purposes for which the moneys in, and to be received in, the State Highway Account have been appropriated, all of the moneys, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is hereby appropriated to, and may be expended by the department for, the performance of such street or highway construction or improvement projects as are agreed upon with the properly authorized officers of the United States, including projects on public or military highways in the State of California which are not a part of the state highway system.

As to such projects on streets or highways which are not a part of the state highway system, such expenditures shall be limited to those items for which the Government of the United States has agreed, and is obligated, to reimburse the state in full, except that the general administrative and administrative engineering expense for which the Federal Government will not repay the state is properly chargeable to the general administration of the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 74.)
-------------------------------------------

823.5.

The department may maintain any street or highway which is not a part of the state highway system whenever all of the following facts exist:

(a) The department has performed upon such street or highway a construction or improvement project.

(b) Such project was financed, in whole or in part, by moneys contributed by the government of the United States.

(c) Either the governmental agency having jurisdiction over such street or highway, or in the case of annexed areas, the county prior to such annexation, has agreed either with the State of California, acting by and through the department, or with the United States to maintain such street or highway to the satisfaction of the authorized agents of the United States.

(d) The governmental agency having jurisdiction over such street or highway has failed to so maintain such street or highway, and the authorized agents of the United States have demanded of the department that such street or highway be maintained in accordance with such agreement.

The department shall carefully segregate all items of cost of such maintenance, including not to exceed 10 percent for overhead and administration. In the event the governmental agency having jurisdiction over such street or highway is a county or city, the director shall notify the State Controller of the expenditures by the department on such street or highway. The State Controller thereupon shall deduct from the succeeding apportionments to such county or city from the Highway Users Tax Account in the Transportation Tax Fund the amount certified by the director and shall place such amount in the State Highway Account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

824.

Expenditures made from the State Highway Account, to the extent to which the United States is obligated by a project agreement to reimburse the state, shall be considered as advancements made by this state for performance on behalf of the United States and shall not be considered as expenditures of state funds.

Such advancements are not subject to any provisions of law relative to allocation of State Highway Account moneys. Such advancements shall be excluded in making the computations required by Section 11274 of the Government Code and the amount of such advancements made, and to be so excluded during any given period of time, shall be deemed to be equal to the amount received from the Government of the United States as reimbursement for street or highway projects and deposited in the State Treasury during that period of time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 76.)
-------------------------------------------

825.

The total of the funds available from the Federal Government and the State for construction or improvement of state highways by the State shall be apportioned between the two county groups in accordance with the provisions of Section 188. Where more projects are available which are eligible for expenditure of federal funds in one county group than in the other, state funds shall be allocated to the county group receiving the lesser expenditure of federal funds to so balance such total expenditures.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 76.)
-------------------------------------------

826.

All moneys received from the Government of the United States as reimbursement for street or highway construction projects shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the fund from which the advancements were made. The department shall certify to the State Treasurer the fund in which each payment is required to be deposited.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 77.)
-------------------------------------------

826.5.

The department, the State Controller, and the State Treasurer are hereby authorized to enter into such agreements, execute such documents, establish and manage such accounts or deposits, and take any other action that may be required to enable the State to receive and expend advancements of funds from the Federal Government in connection with the construction of highways for which federal funds are available. Expenditures from such advances shall be so accounted for as to comply with Section 825 of this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1607.)
-------------------------------------------

827.

The department may insert in the specifications for any contract for any project as to which a project agreement has been executed by and between the State and the United States a stipulation that the contractor shall forfeit to the State the sum of ten dollars ($10) for each calendar day, or portion thereof, for each person who is employed upon the project in violation of the specifications relating to selection of labor, wages, hours, and conditions of employment, and the contractor shall be bound thereby.

The department may insert in the specifications for any such contract all special provisions required by the rules and regulations of the properly authorized officers of the United States, regardless of whether or not any such provision tends to increase the cost of the work.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 76.)
-------------------------------------------

828.

The provisions of this article, as added by the Legislature at its 1955 Regular Session, are not to be considered a change in existing law, but merely a continuation thereof. It is hereby declared to be the intent of the Legislature that the only purpose of repealing and reenacting these provisions is to validate, as a part of the Streets and Highways Code, the original enactment of the provisions of this article by Chapter 360 of the Statutes of 1935 and the subsequent amendments thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 78.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Allowances to Water Districts for Severance Aid [830. - 834.]

830.

For purposes of this article, the term “public water district” means any special district, as defined in subdivision (m) of Section 54775 of the Government Code, which has, among its powers, the power to store, control, or distribute water.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1410.)
-------------------------------------------

831.

Whenever real property within a public water district is acquired for state highway purposes on or after the effective date of this section, the director shall calculate an amount of severance aid as provided in this section, in addition to any other allowances provided by law to be paid to the district.

For the five-year period following the acquisition of such property, based on the amount of tax revenues the district would have received from such property if there had been no such acquisition, the director shall calculate the district’s severance aid as follows: for the year following such acquisition, the district shall be allowed the amount of tax revenues that would have been paid during the year of acquisition, if the taxes assessed on the property acquired were then paid in full; for the second year, the district shall be allowed 80 percent of such amount; for the third year, the district shall be allowed 60 percent of such amount; for the fourth year, the district shall be allowed 40 percent of such amount; and for the fifth year, the district shall be allowed 20 percent of such amount.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1410.)
-------------------------------------------

832.

On or before April 20th of each year, the director shall determine and certify to the State Controller the amount of severance aid computed and to be allowed to water districts under Section 831 for the fiscal year. On or before May 15th of each year, the State Controller shall allocate from the Motor Vehicle Transportation Tax Fund the amount of severance aid computed and to be allowed to water districts for the current fiscal year as so certified.

The Department may charge or allocate the amounts so transferred to the appropriate particular projects on account of which the severance aid was computed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1410.)
-------------------------------------------

833.

(a) No money shall be allocated to any water district for any fiscal year pursuant to this article, unless the Legislature approves such allocation for that fiscal year pursuant to this section by appropriating the money from the Motor Vehicle Transportation Tax Fund for such purpose.

(b) In case the amount of money appropriated by the Legislature for purposes of this article during any fiscal year is insufficient to pay the amounts provided for in Section 831, the amounts provided for in that section shall be reduced proportionately.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1410.)
-------------------------------------------

834.

No allowance of severance aid shall be made as provided in Section 831 unless the total assessed value of taxable real property within the water district is reduced by 2 percent or more during a fiscal year by reason of acquisitions giving rise to severance aid as provided in Section 831. In determining whether or not the value of such acquisitions is equal to 2 percent or more of the value of taxable real property, all such acquisitions made during each fiscal year shall be considered as one sum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1410.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Bridge Safety [835. - 835.]

835.

Every owner or operator of a highway bridge which is open to use by the public, other than one owned or operated by any state or federal agency, city, or county, shall, on or before January 1, 1991, notify the city or county, or both, in which the bridge is located, of the existence of the bridge and its location, date of construction, and length and width in feet.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 605, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Highway Proceedings Affecting Private Property [854. - 876.]



  ARTICLE 1. Change of Grade [854. - 859.]

854.

Whenever the commission shall deem it expedient to alter the established grade of any State highway, or portion thereof, within a city, the commission may by resolution declare its intention to alter such established grade, in which resolution must be briefly specified the grade to be established, together with a reference to a place where a profile map or maps showing the new grade and the old may be examined, and a place in the city where objections may be presented. A copy of such profile map or maps shall be furnished to the governing body having jurisdiction of any highway intersecting or intercepting any affected portion of the State highway.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1939, Ch. 264.)
-------------------------------------------

855.

Notice of such proposed change of grade shall be given by posting and publication of such resolution. Publication shall be made at least once a week for two consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation published in the city in which the portion of State highway affected is located, or if there is no newspaper in such city, then in a newspaper of general circulation published in the county. If there is no newspaper in either the city or county, notice by posting is sufficient. Notice by posting shall be given by posting copies of the resolution, indicating thereon the date of the first publication thereof, if any, in conspicuous places along the portion of the highway affected at intervals of not to exceed 200 feet, and in the event such highway is intersected or intercepted by other highways at least two of such notices shall be posted in each block. In no event shall less than three copies of the notice be posted. Postings shall be made within five days of the date of the first publication, if any. Within five days after the same is posted, a copy of such notice shall be furnished to the governing body having jurisdiction of any such intersecting or intercepting highway.

(History: Added by Stats. 1935, Ch. 689.)
-------------------------------------------

856.

Within sixty days after the completion of posting, any person may make and file at the place specified in said resolution his written objection to such proposed change in grade, setting forth the amount in which he claims that his interest in any real property will be damaged if such change be completed. Such objections may be filed by mailing them by registered mail, return receipt requested, or by personal delivery to the address specified in the notice as the place for presenting objections.

Any person failing to file such written objection within such sixty day period waives his right to compensation for any damage to his property by such change of grade.

(History: Added by Stats. 1935, Ch. 689.)
-------------------------------------------

857.

After the expiration of such sixty day period, the commission may by resolution officially change and reestablish the official grade of said highway in accordance with such resolution of intention.

(History: Added by Stats. 1935, Ch. 689.)
-------------------------------------------

858.

The department shall not make any change in the physical grade of said highway affecting any property as to which an objection has been filed until it has been finally determined by a court of competent jurisdiction that the objection filed is without merit or until the probable compensation has been deposited for each person filing an objection as provided in Article 1 (commencing with Section 1255.010) of Chapter 6 of, or the amount of the award has been deposited as provided in Article 2 (commencing with Section 1268.110) of Chapter 11 of, Title 7 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1240.)
-------------------------------------------

859.

In the event that such changed grade of a State highway fails to meet the grade of any intersecting or intercepting highway, the department is authorized and directed, at the same time, to do such work as is necessary in order to cause such intersecting or intercepting highway to meet the State highway at grade and to restore it to its previous condition of surface, as near as may be. The procedure set forth in this article for the change of grade of the State highway in a city may be followed as to the portion of such intersecting or intercepting highway, the grade of which is changed. In lieu of, or in addition to, the above procedure mentioned in this section, the department and the governing body having jurisdiction over any such intersecting or intercepting highway may enter into a cooperative agreement in respect to the doing of any work authorized by this article, or the taking of any action in respect to such intersecting or intercepting highway as may be authorized by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1935, Ch. 689.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Establishment of Boundaries [862. - 870.]

862.

The department may proceed as provided in this article to establish the boundaries of any State highway right of way where such boundaries are unknown or uncertain.

(History: Added by Stats. 1935, Ch. 689.)
-------------------------------------------

863.

A right of way map shall be filed as provided in section 128, showing such boundaries as are claimed by the State. Such map shall delineate such boundaries to be established with sufficient detail to enable the lines to be located on the ground by survey.

(History: Added by Stats. 1935, Ch. 689.)
-------------------------------------------

864.

After filing such map, the department shall publish a notice at least once in a newspaper of general circulation published in the county wherein the unknown or uncertain boundaries are located. Such notice shall contain:

(a) A statement that proceedings are being taken under this article of this code for the establishment of the boundaries of a certain section of highway, describing such section briefly.

(b) A reference to the said recorded map, by number, or map book and page, for definite information as to said boundaries.

(c) An address within the county at which objections in writing to such boundaries may be filed.

(d) A statement that failure to file such objection within six months from the date of publication of notice constitutes a waiver of any owner’s rights to object to the boundaries so established.

(History: Added by Stats. 1935, Ch. 689.)
-------------------------------------------

865.

Within fifteen days from the publication of such notice, the department shall post signs along and approximately on the boundaries delineated on such map in conspicuous places and at intervals of not more than one-fourth of a mile, and in no event no less than three signs. Such signs shall bear in letters at least one inch high the words “Highway Line” and in smaller print shall state:

(a) All the information required in the notice provided for in section 864.

(b) The date of the publication of such notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1935, Ch. 689.)
-------------------------------------------

866.

The department shall restore any such signs which have been destroyed or become illegible in the third month after the first posting.

(History: Added by Stats. 1935, Ch. 689.)
-------------------------------------------

867.

Any owner of property abutting on any highway, the boundary of which is so proposed to be established, who disputes the correctness of the highway boundary claimed and so proposed to be established, must file his written objection at the place specified in said notice within six months of the date of publication of notice, specifying in what respect and to what extent the proposed boundary, as it affects his property, is erroneous.

(History: Added by Stats. 1935, Ch. 689.)
-------------------------------------------

868.

Any owner who fails to file such objection within such six months period waives his right to object and is conclusively presumed to have agreed to the boundary delineated on the map and the same becomes, as to his property, the agreed and established boundary of such highway.

(History: Added by Stats. 1935, Ch. 689.)
-------------------------------------------

869.

If an objection is filed the department shall not perform any work on the property claimed by the objector until it has been finally determined by a court of competent jurisdiction that the objection filed is without merit or until the probable compensation has been deposited for the person filing the objection as provided in Article 1 (commencing with Section 1255.010) of Chapter 6 of, or the amount of the award has been deposited as provided in Article 2 (commencing with Section 1268.110) of Chapter 11 of, Title 7 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure. This section shall not apply insofar as any objector may make claim to a part of the established traveled way.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1240.)
-------------------------------------------

870.

The proceedings hereby authorized may be taken only to establish the boundary of a public easement for highway purposes, and it is not presumed that any nonobjecting owner has agreed to any greater interest than an easement in the public.

(History: Added by Stats. 1935, Ch. 689.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Procedure [875. - 876.]

875.

The procedure provided in this chapter is not exclusive and shall not prohibit the department from proceeding in any other manner authorized by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1935, Ch. 689.)
-------------------------------------------

876.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as a waiver of any right heretofore acquired by the public for highway purposes and no proceeding authorized in this chapter shall constitute a waiver of any statute of limitations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1935, Ch. 689.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Acquisition of Shore Line Property [880. - 881.]

880.

Where land not exceeding 300 feet in width intervenes between the right-of-way line of a state highway, either existing or to be constructed, and the mean high tide line of the Pacific Ocean, or bays or estuaries thereof, the land may be acquired as a part of the highway right-of-way acquisition.

Land heretofore or hereafter so acquired may, except when required, in whole or in part, for state highway widening or other state highway requirements, be transferred to the control of the State Park and Recreation Commission and, when so transferred, shall be dedicated in perpetuity for beach, park, and recreational purposes for the benefit and use of the public. However, where such land which is not necessary for state highway purposes is producing oil, gas, or other hydrocarbons, or is within a distance of 660 feet from a producing oil or gas well, then if by a majority vote of the State Park and Recreation Commission and the California Transportation Commission it is determined that the acquisition of an easement thereof is desirable, and if the portion thereof lying between the mean high tide line and the extreme high tide line is not occupied by any well and adequate well sites exist on the remainder of the property, then, in accordance with this section, an easement may be acquired upon and over the portion of such land lying between the mean high tide line and the extreme high tide line as a right-of-way for persons traveling on foot and on horseback and for fishermen and for bathers.

If such land is more valuable for commercial purposes than for recreational purposes by reason of its use or suitability for railroad rights-of-way, docks, wharves, or other shipping or industrial purposes, or is producing oil, gas, or other hydrocarbons, or is within a distance of 660 feet from a producing oil or gas well, or is being zoned by the proper public authority for important commercial development, it shall not be acquired for such park or recreational purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

881.

Contracts may be entered into between the department and the State Park and Recreation Commission for those acquisitions and transfers specified in Section 880, which contracts shall provide for the payment into the State Highway Account of the entire cost of such acquisition from any appropriation made to the State Park and Recreation Commission for acquisition of beaches or parks.

Nothing in this chapter shall be deemed a limitation on the authority granted to the department under any other provision of this code, or under other law, to acquire property for highway purposes, including beach and shore line property, and nothing in this chapter shall require the department or the California Transportation Commission to acquire for, or to transfer to, the State Park and Recreation Commission any property required for state highway purposes, or to acquire any property for state park system purposes, when, in the opinion of the California Transportation Commission, the acquisition of such property is not practicable or in the public interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 80.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8. Nonmotorized Transportation [885. - 894.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [885. - 886.]

885.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that traffic congestion, air pollution, noise pollution, public health, energy shortages, consumer costs, and land-use considerations resulting from a primary reliance on the automobile for transportation are each sufficient reasons to provide for multimodal transportation systems.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 517, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

885.1.

This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the Protected Bikeways Act of 2014.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 495, Sec. 2.   (AB 1193)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

885.2.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) California’s bicycle programs have not been fully developed or funded.

(b) The Legislature and Congress have enacted laws to reduce traffic congestion and improve air quality.

(c) The components of a successful bicycle program include engineering and design of safe facilities, education of bicyclists, and the motoring public on lawful use of the highways, and enforcement of traffic laws.

(d) Efforts to improve safety and convenience for nonmotorized transportation users are a proper use of transportation funds.

(e) The design and maintenance of many of our bridges and highways present physical obstacles to use by bicycles.

(f) The bicycle is a legitimate transportation mode on public roads and highways.

(g) Bicycle transportation can be an important, low-cost strategy to reduce reliance on the single-passenger automobile and can contribute to a reduction in air pollution and traffic congestion.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 517, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

886.

There is in the department a bicycle facilities coordinator who is responsible for the administration of bicycle-related activities of the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 517, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Nonmotorized Transportation Facilities [887. - 888.8.]

887.

As used in this chapter, “nonmotorized transportation facility” means a facility designed primarily for the use of pedestrians, bicyclists, or equestrians. It may be designed primarily for one or more of those uses.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 517, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

887.2.

The department, in cooperation with local agencies, shall publish a statewide map illustrating state highway routes available for the use of bicyclists and, where bicyclists are prohibited from using a state highway, illustrating, in such a case, safe, alternate routes available to the bicyclist.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 517, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

887.4.

Prior to December 31 of each year, the department shall prepare and submit an annual report to the Legislature summarizing programs it has undertaken for the development of nonmotorized transportation facilities, including a summary of major and minor projects. The report shall document all state funding for bicycle programs, including funds from the Bicycle Transportation Account, the Transportation Planning and Development Account, and the Clean Air Transportation Improvement Act. The report shall also summarize the existing directives received by the department from the Federal Highway Administration concerning the availability of federal funds for the programs, together with an estimate of the fiscal impact of the federal participation in the programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 877, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

887.6.

Upon the request of a public agency, as defined by Section 6500 of the Government Code, the department may enter into an agreement with the agency for the construction and maintenance of nonmotorized transportation facilities which generally follow a state highway right-of-way where the department has determined that the facility will improve safety and convenience for bicyclists.

The department’s contribution, if any, to the cost of constructing the nonmotorized facilities shall be based upon a finding that the traffic safety or capacity of the highway will be increased. The agreements may provide for the handling and accounting of funds, the acquisition or conveyance of right-of-way, maintenance, and any other phase of the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 517, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

887.8.

(a) After consulting with the law enforcement agency having primary traffic law enforcement responsibility with respect to the state highway, the department may construct and maintain nonmotorized transportation facilities approximately paralleling that highway.

(b) Where the traffic safety or capacity of the highway would be increased, the department shall pay for the construction and maintenance of nonmotorized transportation facilities approximately paralleling the highway.

(c) The Legislature finds and declares that the construction and maintenance of nonmotorized transportation facilities constitute a highway purpose under Article XIX of the California Constitution, and justify the expenditure of highway funds and the exercise of the power of eminent domain therefor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 517, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

888.

The department shall not construct a state highway as a freeway that will result in the severance or destruction of an existing major route for nonmotorized transportation traffic and light motorcycles, unless it provides a reasonable, safe, and convenient alternate route or such a route exists.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 517, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

888.2.
